Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-429
Stamps; issuance.

The commission shall provide for the issuance of habitat stamps, aquatic habitat stamps, and Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamps in the manner provided in section 37-406.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 11;

Laws 1983, LB 174, § 5;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-216.05;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 139;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 29;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 11.